District of Columbia statutes.
29-1202.05

Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

(a)

If a record delivered to the Mayor for filing under this title and filed by the Mayor contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

(1)

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

(2)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a trustee of a statutory trust, if:

(A)

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the trust; and

(B)

The trustee had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the trustee reasonably could have:

(i)

Effected an amendment under § 29-1202.02;

(ii)

Filed a petition under § 29-1202.04; or

(iii)

Delivered to the Mayor for filing a statement of change under § 29-104.07 or a statement of correction under § 29-102.05.

(b)

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this title affirms under penalty of making false statements that the information stated in the record is accurate.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(3)(C), 59 DCR 13171

History

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes